Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1476.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 13, chapter 36, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 13-3619.01, to read: START_STATUTE13-3619.01. Child neglect; affirmative defense; classification A. A person having custody of a child commits child neglect by engaging in conduct that harms the child and that involves neglect as defined in section 8-201, paragraph 25, subdivision (c) or (d). B. It is an affirmative defense to a violation of this section if the person is the mother of the child and during the mother's pregnancy, the mother completed alcohol or drug treatment. C. Child neglect is a class 6 felony. END_STATUTE